Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.30.030

When a contribution. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) An electioneering communication made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a candidate's authorized committee, or their agents is a contribution to the candidate.

(2) An electioneering communication made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a political committee or its agents is a contribution to the political committee.

(3) If an electioneering communication is not a contribution pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the sponsor shall file an affidavit or declaration so stating at the time the sponsor is required to report the electioneering communication expense under RCW 29B.30.020.

[ 2024 c 164 s 435; 2010 c 204 s 503; 2005 c 445 s 4. Formerly RCW 42.17A.310, 42.17.570.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective dates—2005 c 445: See note following RCW 29B.30.010.